Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 64 Military Justice
12-64-830. False official statements.

Any person subject to this code who, with intent to deceive, signs any false record, return, regulation, rule, order, or other official document, knowing it to be false, or makes any other false official statement knowing it to be false, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 148; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-730; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 964.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “rule”.

12-64-831. Misuse of military property.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if, without proper authority, he or she:

Sells or otherwise disposes of;

Willfully or through neglect damages, destroys, or loses; or

Willfully or through neglect suffers to be lost, damaged, destroyed, sold, or wrongfully disposed of;

any military property of the United States or of the state.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 149; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-731.

12-64-832. Misuse of nonmilitary property.

Any person subject to this code who, while in a duty status, willfully or recklessly wastes, spoils, or otherwise willfully and wrongfully destroys or damages any property other than military property of the United States or of the state shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 150; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-732.

12-64-833. Improper hazarding of vessel or vehicle.

A person subject to this code who willfully and wrongfully hazards or suffers to be hazarded any vessel or vehicle of the United States Armed Forces or of the organized militia shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

A person subject to this code who negligently hazards or suffers to be hazarded any vessel or vehicle of the United States Armed Forces or of the organized militia shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added “or vehicle” in the section heading; and, in (a) and (b), inserted “or vehicle” and substituted “United States Armed Forces” for “armed forces of the United States”.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 151; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-733; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 36.

12-64-834. Drunken or reckless driving.

Any person subject to this code who operates any vehicle while under the influence of intoxicants or drugs, or in a reckless or wanton manner, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 152; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-734.

12-64-835. Misbehavior while at post.

Any person subject to this code who is found drunk on duty or sleeping upon his or her post, or who leaves his or her post before he or she is regularly relieved, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 153; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-735.

12-64-836. Dueling or fighting.

A person subject to this code who fights, without authority, or promotes, or is concerned in or connives at fighting or dueling, or who, having knowledge of a challenge sent or about to be sent, fails to report the fact promptly to the proper authority shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 154; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-736; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 37.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “without authority” and substituted “or dueling” for “a duel”.

12-64-837. Malingering.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if he or she, for the purpose of avoiding work, duty, or service in the organized militia:

Feigns illness, physical disablement, mental lapse, or derangement; or

Intentionally inflicts self-injury.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 155; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-737.

12-64-838. Riot or breach of peace.

Any person subject to this code who causes or participates in any riot or breach of the peace shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 156; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-738.

12-64-839. Provoking speeches or gestures.

Any person subject to this code who uses provoking or reproachful words or gestures towards any other person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 157; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-739.

12-64-840. Perjury.

Any person subject to this code who in a judicial proceeding or in a course of justice conducted under this code willfully and corruptly gives, upon a lawful oath or in any form allowed by law to be substituted for an oath, any false testimony material to the issue or matter of inquiry is guilty of perjury and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 158; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-740.

12-64-841. Frauds against the government.

Any person subject to this code shall, upon conviction, be punished as a court-martial may direct if he or she:

Knowing it to be false or fraudulent makes any claim against the United States, the state or any officer thereof; or presents to any person in the civil or military service thereof, for approval or payment, any claim against the United States, the state or any officer thereof;

For the purpose of obtaining approval, allowance, or payment of any claim against the United States, the state or any officer thereof makes or uses any writing or other paper knowing it to contain any false or fraudulent statements; makes any oath to any fact or to any writing or other paper knowing the oath to be false; or forges or counterfeits any signature upon any writing or other paper or uses any such signature knowing it to be forged or counterfeited;

Having charge, possession, custody, or control of any money or other property of the United States or the state, furnished or intended for the armed forces of the United States or the organized militia or any force thereof, knowingly delivers to any person having authority to receive it, any amount thereof less than that for which he or she receives a certificate or receipt; or

Being authorized to make or deliver any paper certifying the receipt of any property of the United States or the state, furnished or intended for the armed forces of the United States or the organized militia or any force thereof, makes or delivers to any person such writing without having full knowledge of the truth of the statements therein contained and with intent to defraud the United States or the state.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 159; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-741.

12-64-842. Stealing property.

A person subject to this code who wrongfully and fraudulently takes and carries away or exercises unauthorized control over the property of another with intent to deprive the owner of the property shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 160; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-742; Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 38.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “property” for “goods of not more than thirty-five dollars’ value” in the section heading; inserted “or exercises unauthorized control over”; substituted “property” for “personal goods”; deleted “of the value of not more than thirty-five dollars ($35.00)” following “another”; and substituted “deprive the owner of the property” for “steal it”.

12-64-843. Conduct unbecoming an officer and a gentleman.

Any commissioned officer who is convicted of conduct unbecoming an officer and a gentleman shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 161; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-743.

12-64-844. General article — Offenses cognizable by courts-martial.

Though not specifically mentioned in this code, all disorders and neglects to the prejudice of good order and discipline in the organized militia, all conduct of a nature to bring discredit upon the organized militia, and crimes and offenses not capital, of which persons subject to this code may be guilty, shall be taken cognizance of by a general, special, or summary court-martial, according to the nature and degree of the offense, and shall be punished at the discretion of that court.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 162; 1983, No. 412, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-744; Acts 2007, No. 47, § 7.

12-64-845. Sexual misconduct.

A person subject to this code who engages in sexual contact with unlawful force, abuse of authority, or violence is guilty of sexual misconduct and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 207, § 1; 2015, No. 1003, § 39.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “engages in” for “attempts or offers to cause bodily harm to another person through”; and deleted (b).

12-64-846. Sexual harassment.

A person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if the person:

Repetitively engages in behavior that involves unwelcome sexual advances;

Requests sexual favors from or offers sexual favors to a subordinate; or

Engages in other verbal or physical conduct of a sexual nature if:

Submission to or rejection of the conduct is made either explicitly or implicitly a term or condition of a person's job, pay, or career;

Submission to or rejection of the conduct by a person is used as a basis for career or employment decisions affecting that person; or

The conduct has the purpose or effect of unreasonably interfering with a person's work performance or creates an intimidating, hostile, or offensive working environment.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “the person” for “he” in the introductory language; substituted “Repetitively engages” for “Engages” in (1); and added “from or offers sexual favors to a subordinate; or” in (2).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 207, § 1; 2015, No. 1003, § 40.

12-64-847. Use or possession of a controlled substance.

As used in this section, “controlled substance” means:

Amphetamine;

Cocaine;

Heroin;

Lysergic acid diethylamide;

Marijuana;

Methamphetamine;

Opium;

Phencyclidine;

Barbituric acid, including phenobarbital and secobarbital; or

Any substance that is included in Schedules I-VI established by the Controlled Substances Act of 1970, 21 U.S.C. § 812, or the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, § 5-64-101 et seq.

A person subject to this code who wrongfully uses, is under the influence of, or possesses a controlled substance shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

A person subject to this code who wrongfully possesses the metabolites of a controlled substance in his or her blood or urine shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 820, § 1.

12-64-848. Adultery.

A person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial directs if:

He or she wrongfully engages in extramarital conduct with another person;

At the time the extramarital conduct occurs he or she is married to someone else or knows that the other person is married to someone else; and

Under the circumstances, his or her conduct is to the prejudice of good order and discipline required by a member of the United States Armed Forces or is of a nature that brings discredit upon the United States Armed Forces.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “A person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial directs if” for “A married person subject to this code who has sexual conduct with a person not his or her spouse under circumstances that prejudice good order and discipline may be punished as a court-martial may direct” in the introductory language; and added (1), (2) and (3).

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 41; 2019, No. 211, § 21.

12-64-849. Retaliation.

A person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if he or she, with the intent to retaliate against a person for reporting or planning to report a criminal offense, or with the intent to discourage any person from reporting a criminal offense:

Wrongfully takes or threatens to take adverse personnel action against any person; or

Wrongfully withholds or threatens to withhold a favorable personnel action with respect to any person.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 211, § 22.

12-64-850. Fraudulent use of credit cards, debit cards, and other access devices.

A person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct if the person knowingly and with the intent to defraud obtains anything of value using a:

Stolen credit card, debit card, or other access device;

Revoked, canceled, or otherwise invalid credit card, debit card, or other access device; or

Credit card, debit card, or other access device without the authorization of the person authorized to use the credit card, debit card, or other access device.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 211, § 22.

12-64-851. Prohibited activities by person in position of special trust.

An officer, a noncommissioned officer, or a petty officer shall be punished as a court-martial may direct for abuse of a training leadership position if he or she:

Is in a training leadership position with respect to a specially protected junior member of the armed forces; and

Engages in prohibited sexual activity with the specially protected junior member of the armed forces.

A military recruiter shall be punished as a court-martial may direct for abuse of a position as a military recruiter if he or she engages in prohibited sexual activity with:

An applicant he or she is recruiting to enlist in military service; or

A specially protected junior member of the armed forces who enlisted under a delayed entry program.

Consent is not a defense for any prohibited conduct at issue in a prosecution under this section.

[Reserved]

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1973, No. 511, § 25, provided that this chapter repealed Act 156 of 1959 and was not to be deemed to repeal any other existing laws pertaining to emergency services, but should be cumulative thereto.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 28, provided that this chapter should not impair or affect any act done, offense committed, or right accruing, accrued, or acquired, or liability, penalty, forfeiture, or punishment incurred prior to the effective date of the act.

Cross References. Arkansas Earthquake Preparedness Act of 1989, §12-77-101 et seq.

Arkansas Hazardous and Toxic Materials Emergency Notification Act, §12-79-101 et seq.

Arkansas HAZMAT Emergency Management Act, §12-84-101 et seq.

Hazardous substance emergencies remedial action trust fund, §8-7-501 et seq.

Interstate Civil Defense and Disaster Compact, §12-76-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1973, No. 511, § 29: Mar. 30, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that there is an immediate necessity to hasten the completion of plans to prepare this State and people thereof against the possibilities of disaster resulting from enemy attack, sabotage or other hostile action, from natural disasters, such as fire, flood, earthquake, or other natural causes, and from man-caused peacetime emergencies, and that enactment of this bill will hasten completion of such plans. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in force and operation from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 891, § 7: Mar. 28, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 511 of 1973, the Arkansas Emergency Services Act, is in urgent need of revision and clarification to enable the State Office of Emergency Services to more effectively and efficiently carry out its responsibilities under said act; that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 629, § 4: Mar. 27, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 511 of 1973, the Arkansas Emergency Services Act, is in urgent need of revision and clarification to enable the State Office of Emergency Services to more effectively and efficiently carry out its responsibilities under said act; that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 687, § 11: Mar. 27, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 511 of 1973, the Arkansas Emergency Services Act, is in urgent need of revision and clarification to enable the State Office of Emergency Services to more effectively and efficiently carry out its responsibilities under said act; that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 978, § 11: Apr. 15, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 511 of 1973, the Arkansas Emergency Services Act, is in urgent need of revision and clarification to enable the State Office of Emergency Services to more effectively and efficiently carry out its responsibilities under said act; that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 1028, § 20: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2003, No. 1366, as amended by Acts 2005, No. 1823, §§ 1, 2, Acts 2007, No. 432, § 1, Acts 2009, No. 560, § 1, Acts 2011, No. 723, § 1, Acts 2015, No. 347, § 1, and Acts 2019, No. 599,§ 1, provides:

“SECTION 1.Findings.

“The Arkansas General Assembly finds that:

“(1)The threat of terrorism and the use of weapons of mass destruction has become a reality in the United States and the State of Arkansas, the emergency service agencies of state and local government have had to assume the new and serious responsibilities of protecting the citizenry from these threats from both domestic and international sources;

“(2)It is incumbent upon emergency service agencies of this state to assess vulnerabilities, make plans, and develop operational procedures to prevent, investigate, and respond to these threats; and

“(3)It is of the utmost importance that those who may engage in acts of terrorism or employ weapons of mass destruction against the people and property of this state not have access to the information designed to prevent and defeat them.

“SECTION 2.Definitions.

“As used in this act:

“(1)‘Catastrophe’ means a man-made event that causes disastrous property damage, death, or serious physical injury to multiple people by explosion, fire, flood, avalanche, collapse of building, distribution of poison, radioactive material, bacteria, virus, or other dangerous and difficult to confine force or substance;

“(2)‘Cybersecurity incident’ means an actual or threatened event that jeopardizes the security, integrity, confidentiality, or availability of the following if owned or used by state or local government:

“(A)Computers, information, or communications systems or networks; or

“(B)Data or other physical or virtual infrastructure controlled by computers or information systems;

“(3)‘Emergency service agency’ means an agency or department of the State of Arkansas or any county, city, or the State of Arkansas that has first responder or investigative responsibilities in the event of a cybersecurity incident or catastrophe or use of a weapon of mass destruction; and

“(4)‘Weapon of mass destruction’ means an explosive, chemical, radioactive, or biological agent, or any other substance or device capable of causing extensive property damage, death, or serious physical injury to multiple persons in a single act or series of acts.

“SECTION 3.Threat assessments and plans.

“(a)(1)The threat assessments, plans, operational policies or procedures, and training developed or maintained by any emergency service agency for the purpose of preventing, investigating, or responding to a cybersecurity incident, catastrophe, or use of weapons of mass destruction are not subject to public disclosure as public records except if the disclosure is determined in the best public interest by the head of the emergency service agency.

“(2)Any document or information received by an emergency service agency from an agency of the United States government, another state, or its political subdivisions that is not subject to disclosure under the laws governing the source agency is not subject to public disclosure as a public record from the Arkansas agency.

“(3)Investigative files of emergency service agencies relating to a cybersecurity incident, catastrophe, or use of a weapon of mass destruction are not subject to public disclosure until after final adjudication.

“SECTION 4.Sunset Clause.

“This act expires on July 1, 2023.”

Acts 2019, No. 599, § 2, provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act should be enacted to extend the current protections of the citizens of Arkansas; and that this act is necessary due to the threat to the security of emergency service agency plans and threat assessments. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 397, § 1, provided: “Title. This act shall be known as the ‘Security Protocol Act for Arkansas Public Events'.”

Acts 2019, No. 397, § 2, provided: “Uniform Security Protocol for Arkansas Public Events Committee — Creation — Membership — Duties.

“(a)There is created the Uniform Security Protocol for Arkansas Public Events Committee.

“(b)(1)The committee shall consist of ten (10) members to be appointed as follows:

“(A)One (1) member who is a law enforcement employee of the University of Arkansas to be appointed by the President of the University of Arkansas;

“(B)One (1) member who is a law enforcement employee of Arkansas State University to be appointed by the President of Arkansas State University;

“(C)One (1) member who is a law enforcement employee of the University of Central Arkansas to be appointed by the President of the University of Central Arkansas;

“(D)One (1) member who is a law enforcement employee of a higher education institution in Arkansas that is a member of the Great American Conference to be appointed by the Governor;

“(E)The Executive Director of the Arkansas Activities Association or his or her designee;

“(F)One (1) member who is a security employee of Verizon Arena to be appointed by the Governor;

“(G)The Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism or his or her designee;

“(H)The Director of the Department of Arkansas State Police or his or her designee;

“(I)The Director of the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management or his or her designee; and

“(J)A representative of Oaklawn Racing and Gaming appointed by the Governor.

“(2)All appointments under this act shall be made within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this act [July 24, 2019].

“(3)If a vacancy occurs on the committee, the vacancy shall be filled by the same process as the original appointment.

“(4)Members of the committee shall serve without compensation but may receive reimbursement under Arkansas Code §25-16-902, through the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management.

“(c)(1)The Director of the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management shall call the first meeting of the committee no later than September 30, 2019.

“(2)At the first meeting of the committee, the members of the committee shall elect from its membership a chair and other officers as needed for the transaction of its business.

“(3)The committee shall conduct its meetings in Pulaski County at the State Capitol or another facility that allows for public access and teleconferencing capabilities.

“(4)Meetings of the committee shall be held at least one (1) time every two (2) months but may occur more often at the call of the chair.

“(d)The Arkansas Department of Emergency Management shall provide staff and materials for the committee.

“(e)(1)The committee shall establish rules and procedures for conducting its business.

“(2)A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.

“(3)A majority vote of the members present shall be required for any action by the committee.

“(f)(1)(A)The committee shall develop a suggested standard security protocol of best practices for admission procedures for public events, whether ticketed or unticketed, held at arenas, stadiums, auditoriums, and other facilities designed to hold large numbers of people for public events.

“(B)In developing the protocol, the committee shall consider without limitation:

“(i)Each applicable venue's size and capacity;

“(ii)Whether the event is ticketed or unticketed;

“(iii)Whether the venue is indoors or outside; and

“(iv)Any other factor relevant to determining the appropriate security regulations for the different types of events and locations throughout the state.

“(2)The protocol specifications shall include without limitation:

“(A)Designation of the types and sizes of items that may be brought into an event;

“(B)Standards for purses, bags, sacks, backpacks, and other implements designed to carry other items; and

“(C)Standards and recommendations for secure admissions to public events.

“(g)(1)The committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management on or before December 31, 2019.

“(2)(A)The department shall notify the arenas, stadiums, auditoriums, and other facilities represented by the members of the committee by publication of the findings and recommendations of the committee on its website.

“(B)Upon request to the department, the findings and recommendations of the committee will be made available to any public entity for use at a ticketed or unticketed event.

“(h)The committee expires on December 31, 2019.”

Effective Dates. Acts 1999, No. 449, § 13: Mar. 8, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that funds provided by the General Assembly for the operations of the Department of Finance and Administration — Disbursing Officer are, due to unforeseen circumstances, insufficient for the Department of Finance and Administration — Disbursing Officer to continue to provide essential governmental services; that the provisions of this act will provide the necessary monies for the Department of Finance and Administration — Disbursing Officer to continue such services; and that a delay in the effective date of this Act could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 751, § 38: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act dissolves and transfers the duties of the Executive Chief Information Officer, Chief Information Officer, and Office of Information Technology; and that dissolving the offices at the beginning of the state's fiscal year will result in a more efficient transfer of responsibilities and funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2007, No. 1290, § 95: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2007 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2007 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2013, No. 169, § 3: Feb. 26, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that weather in Arkansas in early spring and summer has the potential for volatility; that this bill addresses the roles and responsibilities of those declaring emergencies locally; and that this act is immediately necessary because the state needs to be prepared for natural disasters and other emergencies. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 702, § 3: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management; and that the provisions of this act should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Cross References. Powers of county judge generally, §14-14-1101.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 211, § 22.

Chapters 65-74

[Reserved.]